Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 3 Employee and Employer Contributions and
Creation of Funds for Contributions,
Benefits, and Administrative
Expenses

47-2-50.
Funds in which assets of the retirement system to be held.

All the assets of the retirement system shall be credited, according to the purpose for which they are held, among three funds, to be known as the “annuity savings fund,” the “pension accumulation fund,” and the “expense fund.”

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 138, § 8; Ga. L. 1973, p. 900, § 2.

47-2-51.
Annuity savings fund and employee contributions; deductions; effect of default with respect to employer contributions; payments, withdrawal, or transfer of funds.

The annuity savings fund shall be the fund in which shall be accumulated the contributions deducted from the compensation of members in order to provide for their annuities. Contributions to and payments from the annuity savings fund shall be made as follows:

Each employer shall cause 5 percent of the earnable compensation to be deducted from the salary of each member for each and every payroll period; but the employer shall not have any such deduction taken from the compensation of a member who elects not to contribute if he has attained 65 years of age or has completed 35 or more years of service. In determining the amount earnable by a member in a payroll period, the employer may consider the annual rate of compensation payable to such member on the first day of the payroll period as continuing throughout such payroll period, and it may omit the deduction from compensation for any period less than a full payroll period if the employee was not a member on the first or last day of the payroll period. In order to facilitate the making of deductions, the employer may modify the deductions required of any member but not by more than one-tenth of 1 percent of the annual compensation from which such deductions are to be made. Each employer shall immediately pay amounts deducted to the board of trustees, in such manner as the board of trustees shall prescribe, which amounts shall be credited by the board of trustees to the member’s account in the annuity savings fund. Beginning July 1, 1980, the employee contributions required under this chapter shall be paid as provided in Code Section 47-2-54;

The deductions under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be made notwithstanding that the minimum compensation provided for by law for any member shall be reduced thereby. Every member shall be deemed to consent and agree to the deductions made under paragraph (1) of this subsection; and payment of salary or compensation less such deductions shall be a full and complete discharge and acquittance of all claims and demands whatsoever for the services rendered by such person during the period covered by such payment, except as to the benefits provided under this chapter;

In addition to the contributions deducted from the compensation of members under paragraph (1) of this subsection and subject to the approval of the board of trustees and such conditions as it may prescribe, any member may redeposit in the annuity savings fund, by a single payment or by an increased rate of contribution, all or any part of amounts that were previously withdrawn from it under this chapter; and

Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) through (3) of this subsection, no deductions shall be made from a member’s salary if the employer’s contribution as to such member is in default.

The accumulated contributions of a member, which contributions are withdrawn by him or are payable in the event of his death, shall be paid from the annuity savings fund. Upon the retirement of a member, his accumulated contributions shall be transferred from the annuity savings fund to the pension accumulation fund.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 138, § 8; Ga. L. 1973, p. 900, § 3; Ga. L. 2000, p. 131, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 783, § 1/SB 55.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in paragraph (a)(3), substituted “amounts that were previously withdrawn from it under this chapter; and” for “amounts that he previously withdrew from it under this chapter; or, subject to such approval and conditions, any member may deposit therein, by a single payment or by an increased rate of contribution, an amount computed to be sufficient to purchase an additional annuity which, together with his prospective retirement allowance, will provide for him a total retirement allowance of not more than one-half of his average final compensation, provided that for this purpose a member shall be deemed to have retired at age 65 and amounts earned after reaching that age shall not be included in average final compensation. Such additional amounts so deposited shall become a part of the member’s accumulated contributions, provided that upon retirement they shall be treated as excess contributions returnable to the member as an annuity of equivalent actuarial value and shall not be considered in computing the pension; and”.

47-2-51.1.
Supplemental Guaranteed Lifetime Income annuities.

For the purposes of this Code section, the term:

“401(k) plan” means the State of Georgia Employees’ Qualified Trust Deferred Compensation Plan.

“457(b) plan” means the State of Georgia Employees’ Deferred Compensation Plan.

“Contingent annuitant” means an individual designated by an eligible retired member to receive survivor’s benefits from an SGLI annuity.

“Eligible retired member” means an individual in retirement, whether retirement is service based or due to disability, who has at least ten years of creditable service or five years of creditable service if such retired member became a member before July 1, 1968, provided that such individual has not elected a partial lump sum distribution under option six pursuant to subsection (e.4) of Code Section 47-2-121.

“SGLI annuity” means a Supplemental Guaranteed Lifetime Income annuity established by the board of trustees pursuant to this Code section.

On or after January 1, 2021, subject to the approval of the board of trustees and such conditions as it may prescribe and the applicable requirements of the federal Internal Revenue Code, the 401(k) plan, the 457(b) plan, and the provisions of this Code section, an eligible retired member may transfer some or all account funds from his or her 401(k) plan or 457(b) plan into an account under the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia in order to purchase an SGLI annuity, which shall supplement the member’s retirement allowance under this chapter.

An eligible retired member may only purchase up to two SGLI annuities and may only purchase an SGLI annuity during the period of time beginning on the commencement date of such member’s retirement allowance under this chapter and ending on December 31 of the calendar year in which such member attains age 70 or in which such member’s retirement allowance commences, whichever is later.

An SGLI annuity shall commence on the first day of the month in which both the eligible retired member’s written application and purchase amount are received by the board of trustees.

An eligible retired member’s election to purchase an SGLI annuity shall be irrevocable upon the retirement system’s issuance of the first monthly payment of the SGLI annuity.

An eligible retired member may only purchase an SGLI annuity by transferring at least $25,000.00 in aggregate from his or her 401(k) plan or 457(b) plan.

Such transferred amounts shall be actuarially converted to a monthly annuity for the retired member’s lifetime only as described in Code Section 47-2-120.

The actuarial assumptions used to determine the actuarial cost of an SGLI annuity shall be those recommended by the retirement system’s actuary and approved by the board of trustees. Such actuarial assumptions may be changed from time to time upon approval of the board of trustees.

The intent of this paragraph is to provide that an eligible retired member shall pay for the entire actuarial cost of an SGLI annuity.

Provided that the applicable terms of the 401(k) plan or the 457(b) plan permit such use, and subject to any applicable conditions or limitations on such use, an eligible retired member may transfer some or all of his or her 401(k) plan or 457(b) plan account funds to the annuity savings fund established pursuant to Code Section 47-2-51 in order to purchase an SGLI annuity.

Any such transfer shall be in compliance with the provisions of Section 401(a)(31) of the federal Internal Revenue Code and shall be recorded in the eligible retired member’s SGLI annuity record.

All of an eligible retired member’s funds transferred to the annuity savings fund shall be expended in full as the purchase amount for the SGLI annuity.

An eligible retired member shall not be permitted to purchase an SGLI annuity with funds that are not transferred from such member’s 401(k) plan or 457(b) plan account.

The sum of an eligible retired member’s retirement allowance calculated as a monthly annuity for such member’s lifetime as of the commencement date of such retirement allowance and any SGLI annuities calculated as a monthly annuity for such member’s lifetime shall not exceed 90 percent of his or her highest month of earnable compensation. An eligible retired member shall not be permitted to purchase an SGLI annuity that would cause such 90 percent limit to be exceeded.

If such limited amount exceeds the limits of Section 415(b) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, such excess shall be paid from the Supplemental Retirement Benefit Plan authorized by the board of trustees, which provides for benefit payments in excess of such Section 415(b) limitations.

An eligible retired member shall elect how to receive an SGLI annuity, either as an annuity for the retired member’s lifetime only or as any of the optional forms of payment specified in Code Section 47-2-121 with the exception of option six under subsection (e.4) of such Code section, even if the annuity payment option selected for the SGLI annuity is different from that elected by the member with respect to his or her retirement allowance under this chapter.

The SGLI optional form calculation shall be based on the age of the eligible retired member and such member’s contingent annuitants, if applicable, as of the commencement date of the SGLI annuity.

An eligible retired member may elect an SGLI annuity that permits a refund of the balance of the purchase amount to the member’s contingent annuitants or estate in the event the retired member and his or her contingent annuitants, if applicable, die prior to receiving total SGLI annuity payments that equal or exceed the SGLI annuity purchase amount. Unless the terms of the SGLI annuity form as elected by an eligible retired member provide for such refund, no part of the SGLI purchase amount shall be refunded or paid to any person, estate, or other entity upon the death of the retired member or any contingent annuitant.

An SGLI annuity shall be subject to increases and decreases in the monthly annuity amount payable based on the form and terms of the SGLI annuity purchased by the retired member.

SGLI annuities shall not be eligible for ad hoc or other postretirement benefit increases approved by the board of trustees, including cost-of-living adjustments, pursuant to Code Section 47-2-29.

No interest shall be paid on amounts transferred to the annuity savings fund for purposes of purchasing an SGLI annuity.

An eligible retired member who elects to purchase an SGLI annuity shall not be permitted to receive a partial lump sum distribution under option six pursuant to subsection (e.4) of Code Section 47-2-121.

Any requirements under this chapter relating to suspension of benefits for rehired retirees shall not apply to SGLI annuity payments.

No additional creditable service shall be granted for any purpose under this chapter as a result of the transfer of any funds from a 401(k) plan or 457(b) plan for the purchase of an SGLI annuity; nor shall such purchase otherwise be considered in computing a member’s retirement allowance.

Any other provision of law notwithstanding, the board of trustees may suspend issuance of new SGLI annuities at any time. Such a suspension shall be prospective in operation and shall not affect SGLI annuities already in effect. Following such a suspension, the board of trustees in its discretion may reinstate the issuance of SGLI annuities at any time.

The administration of the SGLI annuity requires that SGLI purchase costs vary from time to time and members shall not have any right to any particular purchase price.

SGLI annuity payments shall be subject to the minimum distribution rules of federal Internal Revenue Code Section 401(a)(9).

History.

Code 1981, §

47-2-51.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 783, § 2/SB 55.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2019.

U.S. Code.

Section 415(b) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, referred to in this Code section, is codified at

26 U.S.C. § 415

and concerns the limitations on benefits and contributions under qualified plans.

47-2-52.
Employer’s duty to deduct and report employee contributions; duty of chief fiscal officer to remit employee contributions; effect of failure to comply.

Each employer responsible for the payment of compensation to contributing members shall deduct and collect from each member’s salary the employee contributions required under the retirement system and shall make a monthly report of such actions in such manner and form as are required by the chief fiscal officer of his employer. Such deductions may be made from future payments or reimbursement check to the employer. It shall be the duty of the chief fiscal officer of each employer to make monthly remittance of employees’ contributions to the board of trustees. Should any employer fail to collect employee contributions or to make reports as required in this Code section, the appropriate employer shall withhold all funds allotted to such employer until he has fully complied with this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 138, § 13.

47-2-53.
Effect of failure of any employee, employer, or reporting official to make contributions or to make reports with respect to employment and membership.

Any other provisions of law to the contrary notwithstanding, if any employee, his employer, or the designated reporting official fails to make such reports properly as are required under this chapter with respect to employment or membership or to make contributions, the board of trustees, after having exhausted all administrative efforts to obtain such reports or contributions, is authorized to and shall declare null and void any and all benefits which would have otherwise accrued to the employee if the proper reports and contributions had been made, provided that those contributions which had been previously credited to the individual’s annuity savings fund shall be forthwith refunded. In addition, such individual shall no longer be a member nor henceforth be eligible for membership.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 143, § 6; Ga. L. 1973, p. 900, § 10.

47-2-54.
Payment of state employee contributions on behalf of employees; inclusion of contributions in compensation for determining benefits; adjustment in compensation of state employees; “pick-up” contributions.

As used in this Code section, the term “member” shall not include a member who, prior to July 1, 1980, elected to cease making contributions to the retirement system.

On and after July 1, 1980, each employer shall pay to the retirement system, on behalf and to the credit of each member during each and every payroll period (1) the employee membership contributions specified in Code Section 47-2-51 for membership service acquired after June 30, 1980, and (2) the group term life insurance contributions required under Code Section 47-2-128 for group term life insurance coverage, except that each employer shall continue to cause to be deducted from the earnable compensation of each member for each and every payroll period one-half of 1 percent of his earnable compensation.

Of the one-half of 1 percent deducted from the earnable compensation of members, one-quarter of 1 percent shall be credited to each member’s account in the annuity savings fund, and the remaining one-quarter of 1 percent shall be credited to the group term life insurance fund, as provided in Code Section 47-19-10, in lieu of the deduction required under Code Section 47-2-128. If a member is not covered by group term life insurance, the entire one-half of 1 percent deducted from his earnable compensation shall be credited to his individual account in the annuity savings fund.

The monthly employee contributions made by the employer on behalf of any member under this Code section shall be used in the computation of the member’s earnable compensation for the purpose of computing retirement benefits and group term life insurance payments, if applicable.

All members shall retain, have, and be subject to all other rights, privileges, obligations, and duties specified by other provisions of this chapter; and all such other provisions shall remain of full force and effect with respect to any matter not specifically provided for in this Code section.

With respect to members covered by Code Section 47-2-244, the employers shall pay employee contributions on the same basis as under subsection (b) of this Code section. Such members shall continue to have deducted from their earnable compensation the additional amount of employee contributions required by Code Section 47-2-244.

With respect to any persons who have retired or who will retire under Code Section 47-2-244, the contributions paid under subsection (e) of this Code section shall be included in current salary and used for the purpose of computing the monthly retirement benefits under Code Section 47-2-244 and for the purpose of computing group term life insurance payments, if applicable. The monthly retirement benefit of each person who retired before July 1, 1980, shall be increased accordingly, effective July 1, 1980.

This Code section shall not apply to city or county officials or employees who are members of the retirement system but who are considered state employees only for the purpose of membership in the retirement system, provided that this Code section shall apply to officials and employees of county boards of health who are members of the retirement system.

It is determined by the General Assembly of Georgia that an adjustment in the compensation of state employees is necessary to assure the future actuarial soundness of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia and to preserve and protect the fiscal integrity of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia so as to ensure the future payment of retirement benefits and allowances to those entitled to same. Therefore, in addition to the employee membership contributions required by subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section, from and after July 1, 1982, as an adjustment in compensation, each employer shall cause to be deducted from the earnable compensation of each member for each and every payroll period an additional 1 percent of such earnable compensation. This additional 1 percent deducted from the earnable compensation of members shall be paid monthly to the board of trustees and shall be credited to the individual accounts of the members in the annuity savings fund. This subsection shall not be construed and is not intended so as to have any effect whatsoever on any amounts of contributions paid to any retirement system other than the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia.

The employee contributions described in this Code section that are credited to the member’s annuity savings account, although designated as employee contributions, are being paid by the employer as “pick-up” contributions in accordance with Section 414(h) of the federal Internal Revenue Code. As such, these contributions are mandatory and no member is entitled under any circumstances to receive such contributions in cash in lieu of having them contributed to the retirement system. Such contributions shall be 100 percent vested for all purposes under the retirement system.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 925, § 3; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1163, §§ 1, 3; Ga. L. 1985, p. 209, § 1; Ga. L. 2007, p. 176, § 1/HB 448; Ga. L. 2009, p. 947, § 14/HB 202.

The 2009 amendment,

effective May 11, 2002, added subsection (j).

47-2-55.
Pension accumulation fund; purposes; employer contributions; crediting of interest and dividends earned on funds of the retirement system.

The pension accumulation fund shall be the fund in which shall be held the reserves for all annuities in force and from which shall be paid all annuities and all benefits in lieu of annuities under this chapter. If a beneficiary is restored to membership, his or her annuity reserve shall be transferred from the pension accumulation fund to his or her individual account in the annuity savings fund. The pension accumulation fund shall also be the fund in which are accumulated all reserves for the payment of all pensions and other benefits payable from contributions made by employers and from which are paid all such pensions and other benefits. Employer contributions shall consist of a percentage of the earnable compensation of members, to be known as the “normal cost contribution,” and an additional percentage of such earnable compensation, to be known as the “unfunded accrued liability contribution.” These contributions shall be borne by appropriations from state and federal funds. The percentage rate of each portion of the employer contribution shall be fixed on the basis of the liabilities of the retirement system, as shown by actuarial valuation, as provided for in subsection (b) of Code Section 47-2-26, subject to the provisions of Code Section 47-20-10. All interest and dividends earned on the funds of the retirement system shall be credited to the pension accumulation fund. Once each year the board of trustees shall transfer from the pension accumulation fund to the annuity savings fund such amounts as are sufficient to allow regular interest on the balances of the individual accounts of members in the annuity savings fund.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 138, § 8; Ga. L. 1964, p. 119, § 2; Ga. L. 1973, p. 900, §§ 5, 6, 7, 10; Ga. L. 2005, p. 535, § 7/HB 460; Ga. L. 2006, p. 93, § 1/SB 466.

47-2-56.
Maintenance of annuity and pension reserves and payment of benefits under this chapter as obligations of the pension accumulation fund; permissible uses of assets of the fund.

The maintenance of annuity reserves and pension reserves, the crediting of regular interest to the annuity savings fund under Code Section 47-2-55, and the payment of all pensions, annuities, retirement allowances, refunds, and other benefits granted under this chapter shall be obligations of the pension accumulation fund, except as provided in paragraph (3) of subsection (c) of Code Section 47-2-128. All assets of the pension accumulation fund and all income, interest, and dividends derived from deposits and investments shall be used for the payment of such obligations and for no other purposes.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 138, § 11; Ga. L. 1973, p. 900, § 9; Ga. L. 1991, p. 130, § 1.

47-2-57.
Certification of normal cost and unfunded accrued liability contribution rates to employers; provision in employer’s budget for employer contributions.

On or before June 1 of each year, the normal cost and unfunded accrued liability contribution rates, as determined on the basis of the last actuarial valuation, shall be certified by the board of trustees to the director or chief administrative officer of each employer having members in its employ. Each such employer shall make provision in its annual budget for funds with which to pay to the board of trustees an amount equal to the normal cost contributions and the unfunded accrued liability contributions on the earnable compensation of all contributing members under their administration and for an additional amount as expense for the operation of the retirement system.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 138, § 8; Ga. L. 1973, p. 900, § 10; Ga. L. 2005, p. 535, § 8/HB 460.

47-2-58.
[Reserved] Commencement date for contributions to retirement system.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 6, effective July 1, 2010.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1949, p. 138, § 8; Ga. L. 1973, p. 900, § 10.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-2-59.
Effective date of chapter; effect of budget appropriations on obligation of state agency or other employer to make contributions.

This chapter shall become effective on February 3, 1949, but neither a state agency nor any other employer or member shall be obligated to make contributions for the pensions and annuities under this chapter until after that agency or other employer has made provision in its annual budget for funds for the contribution of its part of such pensions and annuities.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 138, § 16.

47-2-60.
Expense fund; purposes.

The expense fund shall be the fund to which shall be credited state or federal funds, or both, to pay the administrative expense of the retirement system and from which shall be paid all expenses incurred in the administration and operation of the retirement system.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 138, § 8; Ga. L. 1973, p. 900, § 10.